dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="বাবা__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ওসি__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="লং__n_mf">
      <e>
    	  <p>
	    <l />
	    <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /></r>
	  </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ভাই__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="বন্ধু"><i>বন্ধু</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্মকর্তা"><i>কর্মকর্তা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সুতরাং"><i>সুতরাং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাসিন্দা"><i>বাসিন্দা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মাওলানা"><i>মাওলানা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খলিফা"><i>খলিফা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রেসলিং"><i>রেসলিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এমপি"><i>এমপি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইঞ্জিনিয়ারিং"><i>ইঞ্জিনিয়ারিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাড়াটিয়া"><i>ভাড়াটিয়া</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিঃ"><i>মিঃ</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শুটিং"><i>শুটিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বামী"><i>স্বামী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাক্ষী"><i>সাক্ষী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভবিষ্যৎ"><i>ভবিষ্যৎ</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জেলে"><i>জেলে</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দাদু"><i>দাদু</i><par n="বাবা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিষ্ঠাতা"><i>প্রতিষ্ঠাতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জনতা"><i>জনতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিবন্ধী"><i>প্রতিবন্ধী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মোড়"><i>মোড়</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশ্বাসী"><i>বিশ্বাসী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সেনা"><i>সেনা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অর্থমন্ত্রী"><i>অর্থমন্ত্রী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সেক্রেটারি"><i>সেক্রেটারি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্মচারী"><i>কর্মচারী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চাকমা"><i>চাকমা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিক্ষার্থী"><i>শিক্ষার্থী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাবা"><i>বাবা</i><par n="বাবা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="অপরাধী"><i>অপরাধী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাক্ষাৎ"><i>সাক্ষাৎ</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বোলিং"><i>বোলিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লং"><i>লং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কোচিং"><i>কোচিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চোরাকারবারি"><i>চোরাকারবারি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিল্পী"><i>শিল্পী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্মী"><i>কর্মী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাংকিং"><i>ব্যাংকিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পরীক্ষার্থী"><i>পরীক্ষার্থী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাই"><i>ভাই</i><par n="ভাই__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রকৌশলী"><i>প্রকৌশলী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আব্বা"><i>আব্বা</i><par n="বাবা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যবসায়ী"><i>ব্যবসায়ী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাটিং"><i>ব্যাটিং</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জলদস্যু"><i>জলদস্যু</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আদিবাসী"><i>আদিবাসী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আইনজীবী"><i>আইনজীবী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নাতি"><i>নাতি</i><par n="বাবা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="নেতা"><i>নেতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এলাকাবাসী"><i>এলাকাবাসী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গোষ্ঠী"><i>গোষ্ঠী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরোধী"><i>বিরোধী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্প্রদায়"><i>সম্প্রদায়</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্মাতা"><i>নির্মাতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ছেলে"><i>ছেলে</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাঙালি"><i>বাঙালি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিনেতা"><i>অভিনেতা</i><par n="বাবা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্বাহী"><i>নির্বাহী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চবিদ্যালয়"><i>উচ্চবিদ্যালয়</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিদ্যুৎ"><i>বিদ্যুৎ</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পররাষ্ট্রমন্ত্রী"><i>পররাষ্ট্রমন্ত্রী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কবি"><i>কবি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দারোগা"><i>দারোগা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ছেলেমেয়ে"><i>ছেলেমেয়ে</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিক্রেতা"><i>বিক্রেতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংবাদদাতা"><i>সংবাদদাতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সহযোগী"><i>সহযোগী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিনিয়োগকারী"><i>বিনিয়োগকারী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যবহারকারী"><i>ব্যবহারকারী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অধিবাসী"><i>অধিবাসী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্যোতির্বিজ্ঞানী"><i>জ্যোতির্বিজ্ঞানী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শাস্ত্রী"><i>শাস্ত্রী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দাদা"><i>দাদা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্থপতি"><i>স্থপতি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কণ্ঠশিল্পী"><i>কণ্ঠশিল্পী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বী"><i>প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অভিযাত্রী"><i>অভিযাত্রী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাষাবিজ্ঞানী"><i>ভাষাবিজ্ঞানী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংযোগকারী"><i>সংযোগকারী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উত্তরসূরী"><i>উত্তরসূরী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিপাহী"><i>সিপাহী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাজী"><i>হাজী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জগদ্ধাত্রী"><i>জগদ্ধাত্রী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শাসনকর্তা"><i>শাসনকর্তা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গোলদাতা"><i>গোলদাতা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="যোদ্ধা"><i>যোদ্ধা</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাজেয়াপ্ত"><i>বাজেয়াপ্ত</i><par n="লং__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্বসূরী"><i>পূর্বসূরী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিলিটারি"><i>মিলিটারি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বুদ্ধিজীবি"><i>বুদ্ধিজীবি</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইহুদী"><i>ইহুদী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মার্ক্সবাদী"><i>মার্ক্সবাদী</i><par n="ওসি__n_mf"/></e>
